Maine, session 132, LD1840.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §2423-A, sub-§2, ¶O, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 452, §4 and
amended by PL 2021, c. 669, §5, is further amended to read:
O. Transport Sell, offer to sell, furnish or transport cannabis plants or harvested
cannabis for authorized conduct in accordance with this chapter on the property or
premises owned, leased or rented by the caregiver, subject to the terms of any lease or
rental agreement; at trade shows or other industry-related events regarding cannabis
for medical use; or through delivery to or private arrangement with a qualifying patient
or registrant as long as the delivery or private arrangement occurs on property or at
premises owned, leased or rented, subject to the terms of any lease or rental agreement,
by the caregiver, qualifying patient or registrant or on public property that is not
designated as a safe zone by a municipality pursuant to Title 30-A, section 3253 or in
any other public space where the sale, furnishing or transport of cannabis plants or
harvested cannabis is prohibited in law;
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2430-N, sub-§8, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 365, §25, is amended
to read:
8. Sales Gross sales; sales tax revenue. The gross sales of cannabis for medical use
for the current and prior fiscal years and the sales tax revenue from the sale of cannabis for
medical use deposited into the General Fund for the current and prior fiscal years.
Sec. 3. Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of
Cannabis Policy; medical cannabis research grant program rulemaking. On
or before January 9, 2026, the Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office
of Cannabis Policy shall provisionally adopt and submit for legislative review rules
necessary to implement the medical cannabis research grant program in accordance with
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 22, section 2430, subsection 5. Rules adopted by the
office pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Page 1 - 132LR0989(05)

Sec. 4. Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of
Cannabis Policy; availability of medical use of cannabis registration and
renewal forms. The Department of Administrative and Financial Services, Office of
Cannabis Policy shall as expeditiously as possible make available on the office's publicly
accessible website all registration and renewal forms in their entirety as a portable
document file or similar file format that does not require the use of independent software,
hardware or operating systems. The office shall also make available registration and
renewal forms in their entirety in paper form available at the office.
Page 2 - 132LR0989(05)